Arkansas, session 2025, HB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-14-115(a)(1), concerning civil office
holdings for county officials, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, A a
person elected or appointed to any of the following county offices shall not
be elected or appointed to another civil office during the term for which he
or she has been elected:
(A) County judge;
(B) Justice of the peace;
(C) Sheriff;
(D) Circuit clerk;
(E) County clerk;
(F) Assessor;
(G) Coroner;
(H) Treasurer;
*SSS051*
01/21/2025 2:54:41 PM SSS051

HB1212
(I) County surveyor; or
(J) Collector.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-14-115(c), concerning civil office
holdings for county officials, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(c) This section does not prevent a person:
(1) From being elected or appointed to an office under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section if he or she held a civil office before
January 1, 2017; or
(2) From continuing to hold a civil office the person held
before appointment or election to an office under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section; or
(3) Who was elected or appointed as a justice of the peace from
serving as a city police officer or school resource officer as described in §
6-10-128 outside the quorum court district he or she represents during his or
her term.



















01/21/2025 2:54:41 PM SSS051